Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 3.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20102-3226.12
Flood protection and water quality
enhancement bonds; warrants authorized.

For the purpose of making partial payments,
the board of directors of a natural resources district issuing bonds pursuant
to section 2-3226.10 may issue warrants having terms as determined appropriate
by the board, payable from the proceeds of such bonds.

Laws 2009, LB160, § 3.